Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-611
City council; powers.

The governing body of a city which has adopted the city manager plan of government shall be the city council, which shall exercise all the powers which have been or may be conferred upon the city by the Constitution of Nebraska and laws of the state, except as otherwise provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 12, p. 500;

C.S.1922, § 4549;

C.S.1929, § 19-612;

R.S.1943, § 19-611;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 42.